Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201381-1201.01
Terms, defined.

As used in sections 81-1201.01 to 81-1201.22, unless the context
otherwise requires:

(1) Community Development Block Grant means the grants distributed pursuant to the
Housing and Community Development Act of 1974 as amended by the Housing and
Urban-Rural Recovery Act of 1983;

(2) Department means the Department of Economic Development;

(3) Director means the
Director of Economic Development;

(4) Economic articulation means the creation of economic activities which
will provide inputs to and markets for other businesses in the state;

(5) Educational institutions means nonprofit public and private colleges,
community colleges, state colleges, and universities in the state; and

(6) Value-adding industry means an economic enterprise that adds value
through processing, fabrication, or other means to goods or services.

Laws 1986, LB 965, § 1;

Laws 1994, LB 1194, § 18;

Laws 2013, LB78, § 10.